Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 23.2 Tampering with Odometers

31-23.2-1.
Declaration of findings and purpose.

The general assembly finds:

That purchasers, when buying motor vehicles, rely heavily on the odometer reading as an index of the condition and value of the vehicle;

That purchasers are entitled to rely on the odometer reading as an accurate reflection of the mileage actually traveled by the vehicle;

That an accurate indication of the mileage traveled by a motor vehicle, assists the purchaser in determining its safety and reliability; and

That motor vehicles move in the current of interstate and foreign commerce or affect that commerce.

It is therefore the purpose of this chapter to prohibit tampering with odometers on motor vehicles, to establish certain safeguards for the protection of purchasers with respect to the sale of motor vehicles having altered or reset odometers, and to create civil and criminal sanctions for the violation of the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 14, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 392, § 1.

31-23.2-2.
Definitions.

As used in this title:

“Motor vehicle” means any vehicle driven or drawn by mechanical power for use on the public streets, roads, and highways;

“Odometer” means an instrument for measuring and recording the actual distance a motor vehicle travels while in operation;

“Person” means any individual, sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, or business trust including, but not limited to, private individuals and motor vehicle dealers, both wholesale and retail, whether the private individual or dealer is a dealer in the ordinary course of business or not;

“Repair and replacement” means to restore to a sound working condition by replacing the instrument or any part thereof or by correcting what is inoperative;

“Transfer” means to acquire ownership by purchase, gift, bequest, or any other means.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 14, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 392, § 1.

31-23.2-3.
Unlawful devices.

It is unlawful for any person to advertise for sale, to sell, to use, or to install or to have installed, any device which causes the odometer to register any mileage other than the true mileage driven. For the purpose of this section the “true mileage driven” is that mileage driven by the vehicle as registered by the odometer within the manufacturer’s designed tolerance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 14, § 1.

31-23.2-4.
Unlawful activity.

It is unlawful for any person or his or her agent to disconnect, reset, or alter the odometer of any motor vehicle with the intent to reduce the number of miles indicated on it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 14, § 1.

31-23.2-5.
Maintenance.

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent the service, repair, or replacement of an odometer, provided the mileage indicated on it remains the same as before the service, repair, or replacement. Where the odometer is incapable of registering the same mileage as before the service, repair, or replacement, the odometer shall be adjusted to read zero.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 14, § 1.

31-23.2-6.
Transfer of vehicle.

Any sales agreement for the transfer of a motor vehicle between persons as defined in this chapter shall contain the words “both buyer and seller have examined the title certificate of this motor vehicle and it correctly reflects the mileage as it appears on the odometer” which shall be placed conspicuously and prominently on the agreement.

It shall be unlawful for any person to transfer ownership of a motor vehicle previously registered in this state or a motor vehicle used by a dealer as a demonstrator unless the person:

Enters on a form prescribed by the department of revenue, as prescribed by state law, the mileage the motor vehicle has been operated. The form shall be signed by both the seller and buyer and contain a statement that both parties have viewed the odometer of the motor vehicle. The form as completed shall then be attached to the instrument evidencing transfer of ownership; or

Enters upon the form “not actual mileage” in the event that the odometer mileage is known to the person to be less than the motor vehicle has actually traveled; or

Enters the total cumulative mileage on the form in the event that it is known that the mileage indicated on the odometer is beyond its designated mechanical limits;

Enters the same information as set forth in subdivisions (1) through (3) of this subsection on the owner’s title certificate; and

The owner of a motor vehicle shall supply its mileage upon the annual renewal registration form supplied by the division of motor vehicles.

It shall be a violation of this chapter for any person to give a false statement to a transferee under the provisions of this section; provided, however, that no person shall be in violation of this chapter where a vehicle has been resold in reliance on the required statement of the prior owner made pursuant to this section.

No motor vehicle, previously registered in another state, shall be registered for use in this state unless the application for a certificate of title in Rhode Island is accompanied by the prior owner’s certificate of title and a form as set forth in subdivision (b)(1) of this section.

The certificate of title of the motor vehicle issued to the new owner by the state of Rhode Island shall:

Be printed using a process determined by the director to be the most efficient and effective means of avoiding unauthorized duplication;

Indicate on its face the mileage required to be disclosed by the transferor under subsections (b)(1) and (d) of this section; and

Contains a space for the transferee to disclose the mileage at the time of any future transfer and to sign and date the disclosure.

No registration card may be issued in this state for any motor vehicle unless:

The application for the registration card contains the prior owner’s most recent registration card and the prior owner’s title; and

The new registration card contains such information as provided on the application.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 14, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 392, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 47, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 194, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 495, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 21; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 21.

31-23.2-7.
Penalty.

A person who shall violate any of the sections of this chapter shall be punished by imprisonment for up to five (5) years or a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or one dollar ($1.00) for each mile representing the difference between the actual mileage driven and the mileage as represented on the vehicle at the time of sale, and the person may be prohibited from working for any motor vehicle dealer authorized to do business in the state of Rhode Island for a period of not more than one year; and if the person has been issued plates pursuant to §

31-3-25

, the plates may be revoked.

Should any person who violates any of the sections of this chapter possess a motor vehicle dealer’s license, this license shall be revoked upon his or her conviction for a period of not more than one year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 14, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 256, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 392, § 1.

31-23.2-8.
Cause of action — Statute of limitations — Damages.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or public law to the contrary, any person who suffers a loss as a result of a violation of any provision of this chapter, may commence an action in either the superior or district court within three (3) years from the date of discovery of the loss, or within one year from the date when through the exercise of reasonable diligence, the cause of the loss should have been discovered, whichever is later. If the seller of any motor vehicle or any previous owner shall have knowingly violated any of the provisions of this chapter, he or she shall be liable to any subsequent good faith purchaser in an amount equal to three (3) times the amount of actual damages and shall also be liable for punitive damages, costs, and reasonable attorney’s fees as determined by the court.

Prior to initiating any legal action as set forth in subsection (a) of this section, a person shall serve a written demand upon the seller or any previous owner by registered mail, return receipt requested, containing the following information:

That the buyer believes the odometer has been tampered with;

Date of purchase;

Name of buyer and seller;

Make, model, year, and VIN of motor vehicle;

Sales price;

Present mileage;

Any repairs done on the motor vehicle since its purchase; and

A demand for a refund or a replacement motor vehicle of comparable value within thirty (30) days of the notification of the seller or previous owner. Should the seller or previous owner comply with the demand within thirty (30) days, the buyer shall forfeit any right to proceed in accordance with subsection (a) of this section. Additionally, a replacement motor vehicle shall be accepted by any financial institution financing the motor vehicle replaced as substitute collateral on any notes made to finance the replaced motor vehicle, and the owner/borrower and/or guarantors on the notes shall not have to pay any penalties or refinance charges.

Any person who knowingly violates any of the provisions of this chapter, shall be absolutely liable to any person suffering a loss, and it shall not be a defense that any plaintiff contributed to his or her own loss.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 14, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 76, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 392, § 1.

31-23.2-9.
Other laws unaffected.

This chapter does not annul, alter, affect, or exempt any person subject to the provisions of this chapter from complying with the laws of any state with respect to the disconnecting, altering, or tampering with odometers with the intent to defraud, except to the extent that those laws are inconsistent with any provision of this chapter, and then only to the extent of the inconsistency.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 14, § 1.

31-23.2-10.
Division of motor vehicles — Odometer inspection.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of the general laws, the division of motor vehicles shall require the inspection by a member of a city or town police department, of the odometer of every motor vehicle purchased from a seller from outside the state of Rhode Island, prior to issuing a certificate of title in accordance with the provisions of §

31-23.2-6

.

For each vehicle inspected, the local police department may collect a fee of ten dollars ($10.00).

In the town of Exeter, the town sergeant, or designees, who shall also be employees of the Exeter town sergeant’s office, are authorized to conduct the inspection required by this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 392, § 3; P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 23, § 3; P.L. 1987, ch. 420, § 2; P.L. 2021, ch. 190, § 2, effective July 8, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 191, § 2, effective July 8, 2021.

31-23.2-11.
Violation constituting deceptive trade practice.

Any violation of the provisions of this chapter shall constitute a deceptive trade practice under the terms of chapter 13.1 of title 6. In addition to the provisions of §

31-23.2-8

, all of the public and private remedies provided for in chapter 13.1 of title 6 shall be available to enforce the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 76, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 392, § 1.

31-23.2-12.
Dealers — Bonding.

All motor vehicle dealers licensed by the state of Rhode Island shall post a bond of not less than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) with the Rhode Island motor vehicle dealers license commission for the purpose of indemnifying a good faith purchaser who suffers any loss occasioned by a violation of the general laws or the rules and regulations of the commission. The bond shall be renewed annually and shall continue in effect for two (2) years after any dealer goes out of business.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 392, § 3.

31-23.2-13.
Dealers — Records.

All motor vehicle dealers licensed by the state of Rhode Island shall retain all records involving the transfer of motor vehicles in the state of Rhode Island, including, but not limited to, those set forth in §

31-23.2-6(a)

and (b), for a period of six (6) years after the date of sale of each motor vehicle.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 392, § 3.